Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.190

Bylaws of association—Direct election of directors from districts of territory.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that directors shall be elected from the several districts. In such case, the bylaws shall specify the number of directors to be elected by each district, the manner and method of reapportioning the directors and of redistricting the territory covered by the association.

[ 1959 c 312 s 19.]